test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-myenster_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - myenster: # 1B
    myenster+N+Sg+Nom: myenster
    myenster+N+Sg+Gen: myenster
    myenster+N+Sg+Acc: myenster
    myenster+N+Sg+Ill: myensterân
    myenster+N+Sg+Loc: myensterist
    myenster+N+Sg+Com: myensteráin
    myenster+N+Sg+Abe: myensterttáá
    myenster+N+Ess:    myensterin
    myenster+N+Par:    myensterid
    myenster+N+Pl+Nom: myenstereh
    myenster+N+Pl+Gen: myensterij
    myenster+N+Pl+Acc: myensterijd
    myenster+N+Pl+Ill: myensteráid
    myenster+N+Pl+Loc: myensterijn
    myenster+N+Pl+Com: myensterijguin
    myenster+N+Pl+Abe: myensterijttáá
